Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.040

Conditions to attendance not to be required.

A member of the public shall not be required, as a condition to attendance at a meeting of a governing body, to register his or her name and other information, to complete a questionnaire, or otherwise to fulfill any condition precedent to his or her attendance. This section does not prohibit any generally applicable conditions determined by the governing body to be reasonably necessary to protect the public health or safety, or to protect against interruption of the meeting, including a meeting at which the physical attendance by some or all members of the public is limited due to a declared emergency.

[ 2022 c 115 s 6; 2012 c 117 s 124; 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 115 ss 5-11: See note following RCW 42.30.230.

Findings—Intent—2022 c 115: See note following RCW 42.30.230.